test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_puuvsah_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - stiváh:
    stiváh+N+Pl+Nom:  stiˊváh
    stiváh+N+Pl+Gen:  stiˊvái
    stiváh+N+Pl+Acc:  stiˊváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Ill:  stiˊváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Loc:  stiˊváin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Com:  stiˊváiguin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Abe:  stiˊváittáá
